Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5903
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Assisted-Living Facility Act:

(1) Activities of daily living means activities such as bathing, continence, dressing, grooming, eating, mobility, toileting, transferring, and self-administration of medication and similar activities;

(2) Administrator means the person responsible for day-to-day operations of an assisted-living facility and includes a person with a title such as administrator, chief executive officer, manager, superintendent, director, or other similar designation;

(3)(a) Assisted-living facility means a residential setting that provides assisted-living services for remuneration to four or more persons who reside in such residential setting and are not related to the owner of the residential setting and, except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subdivision, includes a home, an apartment, or a facility; and

(b) Assisted-living facility does not include a home, an apartment, or a facility in which (i) casual care is provided at irregular intervals or (ii) a competent person residing in such home, apartment, or facility provides for or contracts for his or her own personal or professional services if no more than fifty percent of the persons residing in such home, apartment, or facility receive such services;

(4) Assisted-living services means services that promote the health and safety of persons in a residential setting, including housing, three meals each day, access to staff for twenty-four hours each day, noncomplex nursing interventions, and support with activities of daily living, and includes resident assessment for admission and continued stay;

(5) Authorized representative means a person authorized by a resident of an assisted-living facility, such as a person holding a power of attorney or a resident designee, or authorized by a court, such as a guardian, to manage the affairs of the resident;

(6) Chemical restraint means a psychopharmacologic drug that is used for discipline or convenience and is not required to treat medical symptoms;

(7) Complex nursing interventions means interventions which require nursing judgment to safely alter standard procedures in accordance with the needs of the resident, which require nursing judgment to determine how to proceed from one step to the next, or which require a multidimensional application of the nursing process;

(8) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(9) Noncomplex interventions means interventions which can safely be performed according to exact directions, which do not require alteration of the standard procedure, and for which the results and resident responses are predictable;

(10) Part-time or intermittent basis means not to exceed ten hours each week for each resident for a period of time with a predictable end within twenty-one days;

(11) Physical restraint means any manual method or physical or mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or adjacent to the resident's body that he or she cannot remove easily and that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to his or her own body; and

(12) Resident services agreement means an agreement entered into by the resident or the resident’s authorized representative and the assisted-living facility that stipulates the responsibilities of the assisted-living facility and the resident, identifies service needs of the resident, outlines the services that will be provided to the resident by the assisted-living facility and from other sources, and specifies the cost of services provided by the assisted-living facility.

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,1998, § 71-20,115;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 60;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-460;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 47;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 637;

Laws 2018, LB439, § 4.
July 19, 2018